Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.235

Collection, administration, and disbursal of funds for industry service programs.

Funds collected and expenditures made for specific industry service programs shall be collected, administered, and dispersed [disbursed] separately from all other funds authorized and collected for research by the commission. The commission may appoint a committee to advise them regarding the need for specific industry service programs and regarding the administration of the assessments collected under RCW 15.26.155.

[ 1983 c 281 s 4.]